Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 2. Federal Lien Registration

Federal tax liens. —

Pursuant to former § 34.1-9-102(b) (now see § 34.1-9-109(c)), the Uniform Commercial Code does not apply to statutory liens like the one the Internal Revenue Service obtains under 26 USCS § 6321; perfection of a federal tax lien is instead governed by the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act found in this article. Straight v. First Interstate Bank of Commerce (In re Straight), 207 B.R. 217, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 454 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

Law reviews. —

See “Precautions of the Title Examiner in Relation to Federal Tax Liens,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 195.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of designation of taxpayer in recorded notice of federal tax lien, 3 ALR3d 633.

Sufficiency of notice of sale of property, under 26 USCS § 6335, seized for failure to pay federal taxes, 26 ALR Fed 381.

§ 29-6-201.
Short title.

This act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act”.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

Applied

in

Straight v. First Interstate Bank of Commerce, 200 B.R. 923, 1996 Bankr. LEXIS 782 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1996).

§ 29-6-202.
Application and construction of provisions.

This act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

] shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

§ 29-6-203.
Applicability.

This act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

] applies only to federal tax liens and to other federal liens, notices of which under any act of congress or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto are required or permitted to be filed in the same manner as notices of federal tax liens.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

§ 29-6-204.
Federal liens; place of filing.

Notices of liens, certificates and other notices affecting federal tax liens or other federal liens shall be filed in accordance with this act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

].

Notices of liens upon real property for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the real property subject to the liens is situated.

Notices of federal liens upon personal property, whether tangible or intangible, for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens shall be filed as follows:

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a corporation or a partnership whose principal executive office is in this state, as these entities are defined in the internal revenue laws of the United States, in the office of the secretary of state;

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a trust that is not covered by paragraph (i) of this subsection, in the office of the secretary of state;

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is the estate of a decedent, in the office of the secretary of state;

In all other cases, in the office of the county clerk of the county where the person against whose interest the lien applies resides at the time of filing of the notice of lien.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

Bankruptcy proceedings. —

Where the internal revenue service properly filed its notice of federal tax lien in the office of the county clerk in the county where bankruptcy debtors resided, the tax lien could not be avoided in bankruptcy as an unperfected lien. Straight v. First Interstate Bank of Commerce (In re Straight), 200 B.R. 923, 1996 Bankr. LEXIS 782 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1996), aff'd, 207 B.R. 217, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 454 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

Federal tax liens. —

To perfect a lien in personal property owned by anyone other than a corporation, partnership, trust or estate of a decedent, the Internal Revenue Service need only file notice of the lien with the county clerk in the county of the taxpayer's residence pursuant to paragraph (c)(iv). Straight v. First Interstate Bank of Commerce (In re Straight), 207 B.R. 217, 1997 Bankr. LEXIS 454 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

§ 29-6-205.
Certification of notices and certificates.

Certification of notices of liens, certificates or other notices affecting federal liens by the secretary of the treasury of the United States or his delegate, or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for filing or certifying of notice of any other lien, entitles them to be filed and no other attestation, certification or acknowledgement is necessary.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

§ 29-6-206.
Duties of filing officer.

If a notice of federal lien, a refiling of a notice of federal lien or a notice of revocation of any certificate described in subsection (b) of this section is presented to a filing officer who is:

The secretary of state, he shall cause the notice to be marked, held and indexed in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 34.1-9-519 of the Uniform Commercial Code as if the notice were a financing statement within the meaning of that code; or

Any other officer described in W.S.

29-6-204

, he shall endorse thereon his identification and the date and time of receipt and immediately file it alphabetically or enter it in an alphabetical index showing the name and address of the person named in the notice, the date and time of receipt, the title and address of the official or entity certifying the lien and the total amount appearing on the notice of lien.

If a certificate of release, nonattachment, discharge or subordination of any lien is presented to the secretary of state for filing he shall:

Cause a certificate of release or nonattachment to be marked, held and indexed as if the certificate were a termination statement within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code and maintain a permanent record of the notice of the lien in the file or on microfilm or by other photographic means; and

Cause a certificate of discharge or subordination to be marked, held and indexed as if the certificate were a release of collateral within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code.

If a refiled notice of federal lien referred to in subsection (a) of this section or any of the certificates or notices referred to in subsection (b) of this section is presented for filing to any other filing officer specified in W.S.

29-6-204

, he shall permanently attach the refiled notice or the certificate to the original notice of lien and enter the refiled notice or the certificate with the date of filing in any alphabetical lien index on the line where the original notice of lien is entered.

Upon request of any person, the filing officer shall issue his certificate showing whether there is on file, on the date and hour stated therein, any notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting any lien filed under this act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

] or under W.S.

29-6-101

through 29-6-107 [repealed] as those sections existed prior to the enactment of this act, naming a particular person, and if a notice or certificate is on file, giving the date and hour of filing of each notice or certificate.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “W.S. 34.1-9-519” for “W.S. 34.1-9-403(d)”; and, in (c), substituted “W.S.

29-6-204

” for “W.S.

26-9-204

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

29-6-101

through 29-6-107, referred to in subsection (d), were repealed in 1988.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Clerk authority.—

District court properly dismissed a property owner’s declaratory judgment action seeking to require a county clerk to remove a notice of federal tax lien (NFTL) from the property record where the clerk had a mandatory obligation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 29-6-206(a)(ii) and 18-3-402(a)(xii) to file the NFTL, and nothing in her general statutory authority or her authority under the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

29-6-201

et seq. (2017), permitted her to independently question the underlying validity of the NFTL, remove it from the property record, or record a document declaring it invalid. Tuttle v. Lee, 2018 WY 104, 425 P.3d 998,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 29-6-207.
Fees.

Fees for filings, lien searches, certifications and copying under this act [§§

29-6-201

through

29-6-208

] shall be the same as the fees prescribed for financing statements under W.S. 34.1-9-409 [§ 34.1-9-525].

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Following the 2001 revision of article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, the apparent reference is § 34.1-9-525.

§ 29-6-208.
Prior filings of notices and certificates.

Filing officers with whom notices of federal tax liens, certificates and notices affecting those liens have been filed on or before July 1, 1988, shall, after that date, continue to maintain in a file, on microfilm or by other photographic means, copies of all federal tax lien notices filed prior to July 1, 1988, notices and certificates filed in numerical order of receipt. If a notice of lien was filed on or before July 1, 1988, any certificate or notice affecting the lien shall be filed in the same office.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 41, § 1.